Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-204 Liability of person assisting
unauthorized insurer. In the event of failure of any such unauthorized
insurer to pay any claim or loss within the provisions of such insurance
contract, any person who assisted or in any manner aided directly or indirectly
in the procurement of such insurance contract and who knew or should have known
the transaction was illegal shall be liable to the insured for the full amount
of the claim or loss in the manner provided by the provisions of the insurance
contract. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next